Utah statutes.
70A-1a-206.   Presumptions.
Whenever this title creates a "presumption" with respect to a fact, or
provides that a fact is "presumed," the trier of fact must find the existence
of the fact unless and until evidence is introduced that supports a finding of
its nonexistence.
